Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF615.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 216C.11, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: b. A person commits the offense of intentional misrepresentation of an animal as a service animal or a service-animal-in-training if all of the following elements are established: (1) For , for the purpose of obtaining any of the rights or privileges set forth in state or federal law, the person intentionally misrepresents an animal in oneâs possession as oneâs service animal or service-animal-in-training or a person with a disabilityâs service animal or service-animal-in-training whom the person is assisting by controlling. (2) The person was previously given a written or verbal warning regarding the fact that it is illegal to intentionally misrepresent an animal as a service animal or a service-animal-in-training. House File 615, p. 2 (3) The person knows that the animal in question is not a service animal or a service-animal-in-training. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 615, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor